Washington statutes.
RCW 28B.76.560

Distinguished professorship trust fund program—Establishment—Administration.

The Washington distinguished professorship trust fund program is established.

The program shall be administered by the office.

The trust fund shall be administered by the state treasurer.

[ 2011 1st sp.s. c 11 s 112; 1987 c 8 s 2. Formerly RCW 28B.10.867.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2011 1st sp.s. c 11 ss 101-103, 106-202, 204-244, and 301: See note following RCW 28B.76.020.

Intent—2011 1st sp.s. c 11: See note following RCW 28B.76.020.